Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2602
Jurisdiction of subject matter; consolidation of proceedings.

(a) The court has jurisdiction over protective proceedings and guardianship proceedings.

(b) When both guardianship and protective proceedings as to the same person are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be consolidated.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 220, UPC § 5-102.

Pursuant to either or all of this section and sections 24-517 and 30-2211, a county court has jurisdiction over a petition for appointment of a guardian for a prospective ward who is 18 years old. In re Guardianship of Tomas J., 318 Neb. 503, 18 N.W.3d 87 (2025).